Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 1. Homicide
§ 6-2-105.
Manslaughter; penalty.

A person is guilty of manslaughter if he unlawfully kills any human being without malice, expressed or implied, either:

Voluntarily, upon a sudden heat of passion; or

Involuntarily, but recklessly except under circumstances constituting a violation of W.S. 6-2-106(b).

Except as provided in W.S.

6-2-109

, manslaughter is a felony punishable by imprisonment in the penitentiary for not more than twenty (20) years.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 1985, ch. 215, § 2; 2010, ch. 54, § 2.

Cross references. —

For definition of “recklessly,” see §

6-1-104

.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (b), added “Except as provided in W.S.

6-2-109

.”

Constitutionality. —

The terms “unlawful act,” “culpable neglect” and “criminal carelessness” in former manslaughter statute were not unconstitutionally vague and ambiguous. State v. Wilson, 76 Wyo. 297, 301 P.2d 1056,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1956).

A sentence of 19 to 20 years for the offense of involuntary manslaughter does not violate federal and state bans on cruel and unusual punishment. Daniel v. State, 644 P.2d 172,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 327

(Wyo. 1982).

Prosecution for homicide of fetus and assault on or killing of pregnant woman not double jeopardy. —

A defendant may be prosecuted both for the act of killing an unborn child during an assault and battery on a pregnant woman and for the assault and battery on the pregnant woman (or her killing) without violating the rule against double jeopardy. Goodman v. State, 601 P.2d 178,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 473

(Wyo. 1979).

Former vehicular homicide provision unconstitutional. —

Former § 31-5-1117(b) (see now § 6-2-106(a)), as it existed prior to the 1983 revision of this title, was unconstitutional and inoperative, due to ambiguity and internal inconsistency; therefore, the defendant, who was involved in a vehicular homicide, could only be prosecuted under former § 6-4-107 (see now this section). State v. Sodergren, 686 P.2d 521,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 300

(Wyo. 1984).

Construction with vehicular homicide statute. —

Equal protection argument that the involuntary manslaughter and aggravated vehicular homicide statutes govern the same conduct fails because the involuntary manslaughter and the vehicular homicide statutes do not govern identical or even substantially similar conduct; that both statutes proscribe an unintentional killing is not sufficient identity of the elements. Small v. State, 689 P.2d 420,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 342

(Wyo. 1984), cert. denied, 469 U.S. 1224, 105 S. Ct. 1215, 84 L. Ed. 2d 356, 1985 U.S. LEXIS 1062 (U.S. 1985).

Vehicular homicide statute (former § 31-5-1117(a)) did not bar conviction for manslaughter (former § 6-4-107).

See Sodergren v. State, 715 P.2d 170,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 485

(Wyo. 1986) (plurality opinion).

Judicial decision as to charging defendant with manslaughter, not vehicular homicide, not unforeseeable. —

The decision in State v. Sodergren, 686 P.2d 521,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 300

(Wyo. 1984), that manslaughter, under former § 6-4-107, was the appropriate charge, rather than vehicular homicide under former § 31-5-1117(a), (b), did not effect an unforeseeable expansion of narrow and precise statutory language by judicial interpretation, nor did it depart from the position taken by the supreme court in previous cases. The court was interpreting the vehicular homicide statute for the first time, so there was no prior interpretation upon which to rely. Furthermore, conduct such as the defendant's had long been recognized as falling within the ambit of the manslaughter statute. Sodergren v. State, 715 P.2d 170,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 485

(Wyo. 1986) (plurality opinion).

Conflicting-penalty provision inapplicable to contention that defendant charged with wrong crime. —

The defendant, who was properly charged with, and convicted of, manslaughter, but who contended throughout his trial and appeal that he should have been charged with vehicular homicide, was properly sentenced under this section. Both the previous and the current statutes proscribing manslaughter provide for a sentence of up to 20 years in the state penitentiary. The defendant's interpretation and application of § 6-1-101(c) (conflicting penalties) was inappropriate; he was never charged with or convicted of vehicular homicide. Sodergren v. State, 715 P.2d 170,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 485

(Wyo. 1986) (plurality opinion).

Elements of manslaughter, first- and second-degree murder identical in part. —

The elements of the lesser offense of manslaughter are identical to part of the elements of murder in the second degree and to part of those of murder in the first degree, as all three crimes contain the element of killing of a human being. State v. Selig, 635 P.2d 786,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 383

(Wyo. 1981).

Not necessary to establish specific intent. —

To prove the crime of manslaughter, it is not necessary to establish a deliberate intent to kill or any other specific intent. Dodge v. State, 562 P.2d 303,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 243

(Wyo. 1977).

Nor malice. —

Where state showed that accused, in conversation with his brother, had threatened to kill decedent, refusal to permit accused to show the entire conversation and that he had told his brother that decedent ought to be disarmed, was not prejudicial to accused, his conviction being only for manslaughter, since part of conversation proved by the state was directed to point of malice and intent to kill on issue of murder in the first and second degrees. Hollywood v. State, 19 Wyo. 493, 120 P. 471,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 19 Wyo. 493, 122 P. 588,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1912).

Heat of passion distinguishes manslaughter from murder. —

If a defendant maliciously kills another human being, he may be convicted of second-degree murder. If, however, the defendant kills in a heat of passion, the crime is voluntary manslaughter, not second-degree murder. Thus, the two elements, malice and heat of passion, constitute the distinguishing factors that differentiate between second-degree murder and voluntary manslaughter. Yung v. State, 906 P.2d 1028,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 200

(Wyo. 1995), reh'g denied,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 219

(Wyo. Dec. 5, 1995).

Proximate cause is not an element of the crime of involuntary manslaughter.

See Sodergren v. State, 715 P.2d 170,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 485

(Wyo. 1986) (plurality opinion).

Nor absence of malice. —

The words “without malice” were adopted to distinguish involuntary manslaughter from the more serious crimes of homicide. They do not have the effect of making absence of malice an essential element of the crime. Cheatham v. State, 719 P.2d 612,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 553

(Wyo. 1986).

“Upon a sudden heat of passion” construed. —

The descriptive phrase “upon a sudden heat of passion” is simply a way of saying that the element of malice required for murder in the second degree and also murder in the first degree is not required; consequently said phrase is not a true element of the offense of voluntary manslaughter and cannot be used to argue that the elements of the lesser offense of manslaughter are not identical to part of the elements of the greater offense of murder in the first degree. Jahnke v. State, 692 P.2d 911,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 351

(Wyo. 1984) (majority opinion by Thomas, J.).

“Provocation” necessary to reduce homicide to manslaughter

must be sufficient to produce a state of mind incapable of cool reflection in a person of ordinary temper. State v. Lantzer, 55 Wyo. 230, 99 P.2d 73,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1940); Searles v. State, 589 P.2d 386,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 351

(Wyo. 1979).

In prosecution for murder of his wife by defendant, evidence did not justify instructions as to manslaughter, where provocation relied on, at time of the shooting, consisted only in wife's refusal to return home with defendant, which was not sufficient to cause a person of ordinary temper to be incapable of cool reflection. State v. Lantzer, 55 Wyo. 230, 99 P.2d 73,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1940).

Provocation of victim, not third person, reduces murder to manslaughter. —

In a prosecution for second-degree murder, an instruction was a correct statement of the law in providing that to reduce murder to manslaughter, the defendant's heat of passion must have resulted from provocation by the victim, not by a third person. Krucheck v. State, 702 P.2d 1267,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 514

(Wyo. 1985).

Degree of homicide held factual matter for jury. —

Whether a homicide is committed upon a sudden heat of passion or purposely and maliciously depends upon circumstances and conditions which the trier of fact is entitled to interpret. Smith v. State, 564 P.2d 1194,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 260

(Wyo. 1977).

If an “uncontrollable passion” is found, it is again for the jury to decide whether that passion brought about the purpose to kill or the purpose to kill brought about the uncontrollable passion. Smith v. State, 564 P.2d 1194,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 260

(Wyo. 1977).

Accidental killing is not voluntary manslaughter.

See Searles v. State, 589 P.2d 386,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 351

(Wyo. 1979).

Burden of proving absence of sudden heat of passion is on the State. —

Instruction in defendant's case allocating the burden of proving a sudden heat of passion to the State, which understandably had no inclination or motivation to prove it, and every reason to disprove it, as it negated the element of malice needed to convict defendant of first degree murder, effectively allowed the State to control the jury's consideration of the mitigator that defendant relied upon for a voluntary manslaughter conviction; thus, the error was more than a simple instructional error as it created one of those rare cases in which an instructional error was structural, and defendant's first degree murder conviction was reversed due to the structural error. Shull v. State, 2017 WY 14, 388 P.3d 763,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo.), overruled in part, Schmuck v. State, 2017 WY 140, 406 P.3d 286,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 14

6 (Wyo. 2017).

For purposes of a voluntary manslaughter conviction, the State has the burden to prove beyond a reasonable doubt the absence of the heat of passion on sudden provocation when the issue was properly presented in a homicide case; the State does not have the burden of proving the sudden heat of passion mitigator. Shull v. State, 2017 WY 14, 388 P.3d 763,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo.), overruled in part, Schmuck v. State, 2017 WY 140, 406 P.3d 286,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 14

6 (Wyo. 2017).

Distinguished from involuntary manslaughter. —

The principal distinction between criminally negligent homicide (§ 6-2-107(a)) and involuntary manslaughter (§ 6-2-105(a)(ii)) is whether the defendant consciously disregarded a substantial and unjustifiable risk or whether he failed, through criminal negligence, to perceive that risk. Murray v. State, 855 P.2d 350,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 1993), reh'g denied,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Wyo. July 20, 1993), cert. denied, 510 U.S. 1045, 114 S. Ct. 693, 126 L. Ed. 2d 660, 1994 U.S. LEXIS 129 (U.S. 1994).

Who may be guilty of involuntary manslaughter. —

Any person, no matter in what capacity he acted, was guilty under former manslaughter statute if he involuntarily killed a person with criminal negligence. State v. Catellier, 63 Wyo. 123, 179 P.2d 203,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1947).

Sufficient evidence to sustain involuntary manslaughter conviction against mother in death of her child. —

Evidence was sufficient to convict mother for involuntary manslaughter for the death of her premature daughter, finding that the child died of hyperthermia and not Sudden Infant Death Syndrome, because (1) only in the scenario in which the child was wrapped in the red electric blanket was the heating of her body adequately explained; and (2) it would account for the marks on the child's body whether they were caused by thermal blistering or sloughing of skin owing to accelerated decomposition associated with high temperatures. Michaelis v. State, 2005 WY 80, 115 P.3d 1098,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(Wyo. 2005).

Evidence was sufficient to find that defendant acted recklessly because (1) defendant was an experienced methamphetamine user who was well aware that her actions in consuming methamphetamine were reckless but deliberately placed herself in a condition which she knew could render her unable to properly care for her infant daughter, and (2) despite knowing that the electric blanket that defendant wrapped the child in got very hot, she elected to wrap her prematurely born child in the blanket at a time when she had rendered herself incapable of properly caring for the child due to her drug consumption. Michaelis v. State, 2005 WY 80, 115 P.3d 1098,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(Wyo. 2005).

In order to sustain involuntary manslaughter conviction premised on “unlawful act”

of speeding, there had to be an additional showing equivalent to criminal negligence and a showing that death had resulted as a proximate cause thereof. Bartlett v. State, 569 P.2d 1235,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 285

(Wyo. 1977), overruled on other grounds, Nowack v. State, 774 P.2d 561,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 1989) (decided before vehicular homicide cases excepted from involuntary manslaughter).

A finding of recklessness is inconsistent with, and precludes a finding of, self-defense.

See Small v. State, 689 P.2d 420,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 342

(Wyo. 1984), cert. denied, 469 U.S. 1224, 105 S. Ct. 1215, 84 L. Ed. 2d 356, 1985 U.S. LEXIS 1062 (U.S. 1985).

For construction of former statutory terms “culpable neglect,” “criminal carelessness,” and “criminal negligence.” —

See State v. McComb, 33 Wyo. 346, 239 P. 526,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 1925); State v. Catellier, 63 Wyo. 123, 179 P.2d 203,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1947); Jeschke v. State, 642 P.2d 1298,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 323

(Wyo. 1982); Brown v. State, 661 P.2d 1024,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 303

(Wyo. 1983).

Expert testimony sufficient to find cause of death. —

The expert testimony presented at the trial provided a sufficient basis for the jury to find beyond a reasonable doubt that the defendant's act of picking up an infant and shaking her was the cause of the infant's death. Rinehart v. State, 641 P.2d 192,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 303

(Wyo. 1982).

Voluntary intoxication. —

A claim of voluntary intoxication does not require a manslaughter instruction in a murder prosecution. Sanders v. State, 7 P.3d 891,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 531 U.S. 1024, 121 S. Ct. 594, 148 L. Ed. 2d 508, 2000 U.S. LEXIS 7997 (U.S. 2000).

Included offenses. —

One indicted for assault with intent to commit murder in the first degree may be convicted for an assault with intent to commit manslaughter. Brantley v. State, 9 Wyo. 102, 61 P. 139,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1900).

Where serious doubt existed of defendant's guilt of second-degree murder but evidence was ample supporting conviction of manslaughter on grounds of criminal carelessness, jury verdict for second-degree murder was set aside, and sustained as to manslaughter, included in former. Eagan v. State, 58 Wyo. 167, 128 P.2d 215,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1942).

Manslaughter is not an offense necessarily included in robbery and therefore not included in the crime of felony murder. Richmond v. State, 554 P.2d 1217,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 215

(Wyo. 1976), reh'g denied, 558 P.2d 509,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 323

(Wyo. 1977).

The offense of aiding and abetting voluntary manslaughter is a lesser included offense of aiding and abetting first degree murder. Jahnke v. State, 692 P.2d 911,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 351

(Wyo. 1984).

The elements of aggravated assault with a deadly weapon are not always necessarily includable in the crime of involuntary manslaughter perpetrated during the commission of an unlawful act. Stamper v. State, 662 P.2d 82,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 301

(Wyo. 1983).

Crime of voluntary manslaughter is lesser included offense of crime of second-degree murder. State v. Keffer, 860 P.2d 1118,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Wyo. 1993).

Information held sufficient. —

An information charging the commission of the crime of manslaughter in the words of this section is sufficient and proper. Shoemaker v. State, 444 P.2d 309,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 186

(Wyo. 1968).

Information for manslaughter which charges that defendant did unlawfully kill the deceased, a human being, contrary to the form of this section, is sufficient without setting out the facts by which the unlawful killing was accomplished. State v. Cantrell, 64 Wyo. 132, 186 P.2d 539,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1947).

Information which stated that the killing was done in the commission of an unlawful act or by culpable neglect or criminal carelessness was not too indefinite because statement was in the disjunctive, for the information may, in a single count, charge the commission of an offense in any or all of the ways specified in the manslaughter statute. State v. Catellier, 63 Wyo. 123, 179 P.2d 203,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1947).

Instructions proper. —

Under plain error review, instructions given in a voluntary manslaughter case were sufficient to capture the specific nuances of a unique crime where a victim died after defendant struck him in the face during an argument over drinking; the jury was given an elements instructions, definitions of voluntary and heat of passion, and a lesser-included instruction on criminally negligent homicide.
Lopez v. State, 2006 WY 97, 139 P.3d 445,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 2006).

Entitlement to instruction. —

The defendant in a murder prosecution was not entitled to a jury instruction on manslaughter because there was no evidence that the defendant killed without malice in the heat of passion where he alleged that the victim stated that he wanted to die and asked the defendant to kill him. Sanders v. State, 7 P.3d 891,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 531 U.S. 1024, 121 S. Ct. 594, 148 L. Ed. 2d 508, 2000 U.S. LEXIS 7997 (U.S. 2000).

Instruction concerning intent. —

Instruction telling jury that if act was not committed intentionally, they could not convict defendant of murder, instead of telling jury that in such event they should acquit, was not erroneous where it did not follow under the evidence that, because homicide was not intentional, defendant was entitled to acquittal. Eagan v. State, 58 Wyo. 167, 128 P.2d 215,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1942).

In a case where defendant was convicted of first degree murder, but sought a conviction for voluntary manslaughter based on the sudden heat of passion mitigator, because there is ample authority that a sudden heat of passion killing not only can be, but often is, intentional, on retrial, it would be improper to instruct or suggest that a killing under a sudden heat of passion could not include a case in which defendant had the subjective intent to kill. Shull v. State, 2017 WY 14, 388 P.3d 763,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo.), overruled in part, Schmuck v. State, 2017 WY 140, 406 P.3d 286,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 14

6 (Wyo. 2017).

Instructions accurately presented defense of accidental killing. —

Under instructions that state must prove homicide was not committed accidentally, and that unless jury found beyond reasonable doubt that it was committed intentionally or by criminal carelessness, they should acquit, defendant was not deprived of defense of accidental killing. Eagan v. State, 58 Wyo. 167, 128 P.2d 215,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1942).

Issue of mental responsibility not submitted by instruction on mental capacity. —

Where the jury was advised that it could consider the mental capacity of the defendant in considering whether there was culpable neglect or criminal carelessness, but where the jury instruction did not in any way require proof of the additional element of mental responsibility by the prosecution, the latter issue was not submitted. Kind v. State, 595 P.2d 960,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 425

(Wyo. 1979).

Instruction based on previous statute fundamentally defective. —

A jury instruction concerning the offense of manslaughter was fundamentally defective and, therefore, plain error, where the instruction was based on the previous version of the manslaughter statute which used the terms “culpable neglect” and “criminal carelessness” instead of the present term “recklessly.” This amounted to an obvious transgression of the requirement that the trial judge must instruct the jury on the necessary elements of the crime charged. Vigil v. State, 859 P.2d 659,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 148

(Wyo. 1993).

Instruction on “recklessly.” —

An instruction did not clearly and concisely inform the jury that “recklessly” was an element of involuntary manslaughter, in that it did not advise the jury that in order to find the defendant guilty of involuntary manslaughter, they had to find that he acted with “conscious disregard.” To act with “conscious disregard” implies intentional acts despite knowledge of the risk, while acting with “wanton disregard” (the language used in the instruction) implies acts done without conscious regard or heedlessly. Therefore, the instruction only created confusion in the minds of the jurors as to what actions constituted the crime in question. Vigil v. State, 859 P.2d 659,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 148

(Wyo. 1993).

Recklessness, as defined for involuntary manslaughter, involves a gross deviation from reasonableness, not a lack of necessity to threaten deadly force; thus, the giving of instructions that threats with a drawn deadly weapon or pointing a firearm at another amounts to recklessness, unless reasonably necessary for self-defense, was reversible error. Olson v. State, 960 P.2d 1019,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 111

(Wyo. 1998).

Sufficient evidence to sustain appellant's voluntary manslaughter conviction. —

See Griffin v. State, 749 P.2d 246,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1988).

Evidence that defendant struck a friend in the face with considerable force during an argument over drinking and evidence that the cause of death was blunt force trauma to the head was sufficient to support a conviction for voluntary manslaughter under this section. Lopez v. State, 2006 WY 97, 139 P.3d 445,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 2006).

Evidence was
sufficient to support defendant's manslaughter conviction where it
showed that he entered the victim's home, struck the victim and his
wife with a beer bottle, which blunt force trauma caused the victim's
death from a subdural hematoma, and he had been upset most of the
day because of his concern that the victim and his wife were reconciling. Bruce v. State, 2015 WY 46, 346 P.3d 909,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 2015).

Other crimes evidence admissible to negate “sudden heat of passion” claim. —

Where question facing the jury was whether defendant killed his wife's lover in a sudden heat of passion, and thus was guilty of voluntary manslaughter, or whether he acted with malice, and thus was guilty of premeditated murder, evidence of defendant's prior assault on his wife's ex-husband, and his threat against her other boyfriend, was admissible to prove motive and intent as those concepts related to malice.
Taylor v. State, 2009 WY 31, 203 P.3d 408,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 2009).

Sentence not abuse of court's discretion. —

The imposition of a sentence of 5 to 15 years for manslaughter was not an abuse of the trial court's discretion. Bentley v. State, 502 P.2d 203,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 279

(Wyo. 1972).

Reduction of homicide to manslaughter by supreme court. —

Supreme court is authorized to reverse conviction for murder in second degree and to order defendant resentenced for manslaughter, while permitting verdict originally of conviction for murder in second degree to stand as to manslaughter, such order not amounting to infringement of due process or right to jury trial. State v. Sorrentino, 36 Wyo. 111, 253 P. 14,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1927).

The supreme court may reduce a homicide to manslaughter if committed under circumstances sufficiently mitigating or extenuating, such as fear or terror of such a character or degree as to render the accused incapable of cool reflection. Doe v. State, 569 P.2d 1276,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 290

(Wyo. 1977).

Bail pending appeal. —

Where appellate court reduced conviction for murder in second degree to manslaughter, accused was not admissible to bail upon an appeal from sentence pronounced for manslaughter, where no questions were raised that had not or could not have been passed upon on the first appeal. State v. Sorrentino, 32 Wyo. 410, 233 P. 142,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1925).

Applied

in

State v. Catellier, 63 Wyo. 123, 179 P.2d 203,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(1947); Goich v. State, 80 Wyo. 179, 339 P.2d 119,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(1959); State v. Rideout, 450 P.2d 452,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 1969); Evanson v. State, 546 P.2d 412,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 1976); Thomas v. State, 562 P.2d 1287,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 249

(Wyo. 1977); Henriksen v. State, 575 P.2d 754,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 271

(Wyo. 1978); Shepard v. State, 720 P.2d 904,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 571

(Wyo. 1986).

Quoted

in

Dowdell v. Bell, 477 P.2d 170,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 205

(Wyo. 1970); Romo v. State, 500 P.2d 678,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 296

(Wyo. 1972); Gore v. State, 627 P.2d 1384,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 340

(Wyo. 1981); Bell v. State, 693 P.2d 769,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 425

(Wyo. 1985); Murry v. State, 713 P.2d 202,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 459

(Wyo. 1986); Longfellow v. State, 803 P.2d 848,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(Wyo. 1990); Suliber v. State, 866 P.2d 85,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 205

(Wyo. 1993); Britton v. State, 2009 WY 91, 211 P.3d 514,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(July 15, 2009); Haire v. State, 2017 WY 48, 393 P.3d 1304,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 2017).

Cited

in

Ivey v. State, 24 Wyo. 1, 154 P. 589,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(1916); State v. Dobbs, 70 Wyo. 26, 244 P.2d 280,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(1952); Hildebrand v. State, 491 P.2d 741,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 271

(Wyo. 1971); Booth v. State, 517 P.2d 1034,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 1974); Thomas v. Justice Court, 538 P.2d 42,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 1975); City of Casper v. Cheatham, 739 P.2d 1222,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 471

(Wyo. 1987); Miller v. State, 755 P.2d 855,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 1988); Stice v. State, 799 P.2d 1204,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 1990); Cook v. State, 841 P.2d 1345,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 1992); Reilly v. State, 2002 WY 156, 55 P.3d 1259,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 2002); Noel v. State, 2014 WY 30,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 170

(Feb 25, 2013).

Stated

in

Shoemaker v. State, 444 P.2d 309,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 186

(Wyo. 1968); Brooks v. State, 706 P.2d 664,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 564

(Wyo. 1985).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Criminal Liability for Death Caused by Operation of Motor Vehicles in Wyoming,” see 18 Wyo. L.J. 213 (1964).

For article, “The Greatest Lawyer in the World (The Maturing of Janice Walker),” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 135 (1979).

For article, “The Changing Structure of Criminal Sentencing,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 591 (1983).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

For comment, “Fetal Equality?: The Equality State's Response to the Challenge of Protecting Unborn Children,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 193 (1997).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Persons, other than actor, liable for manslaughter, 95 ALR2d 175.

Insulting words as reducing degree of homicide, 2 ALR3d 1292.

Propriety of predicating manslaughter conviction on violation of local ordinance or regulation not dealing with motor vehicles, 85 ALR3d 1072.

Spouse's confession of adultery as affecting degree of homicide involved in killing spouse or his or her paramour, 93 ALR3d 925.

Accused's right, in homicide case, to have jury instructed as to both unintentional shooting and self-defense, 15 ALR4th 983.

Admissibility of expert or opinion testimony on battered wife or battered woman syndrome, 18 ALR4th 1153.

Propriety of manslaughter conviction in prosecution for murder, absent proof of necessary elements of manslaughter, 19 ALR4th 861.

Standard for determination of reasonableness of criminal defendant's belief, for purposes of self-defense claim, that physical force is necessary — modern cases, 73 ALR4th 993.

Homicide: liability where death immediately results from treatment or mistreatment of injury inflicted by defendant, 50 ALR5th 467.

Homicide based on killing of unborn child, 64 ALR5th 671.

Propriety of lesser included offense charge of voluntary manslaughter to jury in state murder prosecution—Twenty-first century cases, 3 A.L.R.6th 543.